de: Kann vererbbare Schäden verursachen, R46
en: May cause heritable genetic damage, R46
cs: Může vyvolat poškození dědičných vlastností, R46
dk: Kan forårsage arvelige genetiske skader, R46
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει κληρονοµικές γενετικές βλάβες, R46
es: Puede causar alteraciones genéticas hereditarias, R46
et: Võib põhjustada pärilikke kahjustusi, R46
fi: Saattaa aiheuttaa periytyviä perimävaurioita, R46
fr: Peut provoquer des altérations génétiques héréditaires, R46
hu: Öröklődő genetikai károsodást okozhat (mutagén hatású lehet), R46
it: Può provocare alterazioni genetiche ereditarie, R46
lt: Gali sukelti paveldimus genetinius pakenkimus, R46
lv: Var radīt pārmantojamus genētiskus defektus, R46
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna ħsara ġenetika li tintiret, R46
nl: Kan erfelijke genetische schade veroorzaken, R46
no: Fare for arvelige skader, R46
pl: Może powodować dziedziczne wady genetyczne, R46
pt: Pode causar alteraçoes genéticas hereditárias, R46
sk: Môže spôsobit’ dedičné genetické poškodenie, R46
sl: Lahko povzroči dedne genetske okvare, R46
sv: Kan ge ärftliga genetiska skador, R46

de: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition, R48
en: Danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure, R48
cs: Při dlouhodobé expozici nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví, R48
dk: Alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning, R48
el: Κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα απο παρατεταµένη έκθεση, R48
es: Riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada, R48
et: Pikaajalisel toimel tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht, R48
fi: Pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle, R48
fr: Risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée, R48
hu: Hosszú időn át hatva súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48
it: Pericolo di gravi danni per la salute in caso di esposizione prolungata, R48
lt: Veikiant ilgą laiką sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48
lv: Iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas saskares, R48
mt: Periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa jekk wieħed ikun espost għalih fit-tul, R48
nl: Gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling, R48
no: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning, R48
pl: Stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48
pt: Risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada, R48
sk: Nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia pri dlhodobej expozícii, R48
sl: Nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja pri dolgotrajnejši izpostavljenosti, R48
sv: Risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering, R48

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen, R48/20
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation, R48/20
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním, R48/20
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding, R48/20
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται, R48/20
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación, R48/20
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel, R48/20
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä, R48/20
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation, R48/20
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/20
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni per la salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione, R48/20
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/20
lv: Kaitīgs – ieelpojot iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības, R48/20
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul minħabba xamm, R48/20
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing, R48/20
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding, R48/20
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/20
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação, R48/20
sk: Škodlivý\, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím, R48/20
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja, R48/20
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning, R48/20

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen und durch Berührung mit der Haut, R48/20/21
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation and in contact with skin, R48/20/21
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním a stykem s kůží, R48/20/21
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding og hudkontakt, R48/20/21
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R48/20/21
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación y contacto con la piel, R48/20/21
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R48/20/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R48/20/21
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R48/20/21
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/20/21
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione e a contatto con la pelle, R48/20/21
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant ir veikiant per odą sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/20/21
lv: Kaitīgs – ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu\, iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības, R48/20/21
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul minħabba xamm u mess mal-ġilda, R48/20/21
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing en aanraking met de huid, R48/20/21
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding og hudkontakt, R48/20/21
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/20/21
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R48/20/21
sk: Škodlivý\, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R48/20/21
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja in stika s kožo, R48/20/21
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning och hudkontakt, R48/20/21

de: Kann Brand verursachen, R7
en: May cause fire, R7
cs: Může způsobit požár, R7
dk: Kan forårsage brand, R7
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει πυρκαγιά, R7
es: Puede provocar incendios, R7
et: Võib põhjustada tulekahju, R7
fi: Aiheuttaa tulipalon vaaran, R7
fr: Peut provoquer un incendie, R7
hu: Tüzet okozhat, R7
it: Può provocare un incendio, R7
lt: Pavojinga gaisro atžvilgiu, R7
lv: Var izraisīt ugunsgrēku, R7
mt: Jista' jqabbad nar, R7
nl: Kan brand veroorzaken, R7
no: Kan forårsake brann, R7
pl: Może spowodować pożar, R7
pt: Pode provocar incêndio, R7
sk: Môže spôsobit’ požiar, R7
sl: Lahko povzroči požar, R7
sv: Kan orsaka brand, R7

de: Feuergefahr bei Berührung mit brennbaren Stoffen, R8
en: Contact with combustible material may cause fire, R8
cs: Dotek s hořlavým materiálem může způsobit požár, R8
dk: Brandfarlig ved kontakt med brandbare stoffer, R8
el: Η επαφή µε καύσιµο υλικό µπορεί να προκαλέσει πυρκαγιά, R8
es: Peligro de fuego en contacto con materias combustibles, R8
et: Kokkupuutel süttiva ainega võib põhjustada tulekahju, R8
fi: Aiheuttaa tulipalon vaaran palavien aineiden kanssa, R8
fr: Favorise l'inflammation des matières combustibles, R8
hu: Éghető anyaggal érintkezve tüzet okozhat, R8
it: Può provocare l'accensione di materie combustibili, R8
lt: Gali užsidegti dėl sąveikos su galinčiomis degti medžiagomis, R8
lv: Saskaroties ar degošu materiālu\, var izraisīt ugunsgrēku, R8
mt: Kuntatt ma'materjal li jaqbad jista' jqabbad nar, R8
nl: Bevordert de ontbranding van brandbare stoffen, R8
no: Brannfarlig ved kontakt med brennbare stoffer, R8
pl: Kontakt z materiałami zapalnymi może spowodować pożar, R8
pt: Favorece a inflamação de matérias combustíveis, R8
sk: Pri kontakte s horl’avým materiálom môže spôsobit’ požiar, R8
sl: V stiku z vnetljivim materialom lahko povzroči požar, R8
sv: Kontakt med brännbart material kan orsaka brand, R8

de: Sehr giftig bei Berührung mit der Haut und beim Verschlucken, R27/28
en: Very toxic in contact with skin and if swallowed, R27/28
cs: Vysoce toxický při styku s kůží a při požití, R27/28
dk: Meget giftig ved hudkontakt og ved indtagelse, R27/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R27/28
es: Muy tóxico en contacto con la piel y por ingestión, R27/28
et: Väga mürgine kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R27/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R27/28
fr: Très toxique par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R27/28
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve nagyon mérgező, R27/28
it: Molto tossico a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R27/28
lt: Labai toksiška susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R27/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R27/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna meta jmiss il-ġilda jew meta jinbela', R27/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij aanraking met de huid en bij opname door de mond, R27/28
no: Meget giftig ved hudkontakt og svelging, R27/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu, R27/28
pt: Muito tóxico em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R27/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R27/28
sl: Zelo strupeno v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R27/28
sv: Mycket giftigt vid hudkontakt och förtäring, R27/28

de: Sehr giftig beim Verschlucken, R28
en: Very toxic if swallowed, R28
cs: Vysoce toxický při požití, R28
dk: Meget giftig ved indtagelse, R28
el: Πολύ τοξικό σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R28
es: Muy tóxico por ingestión, R28
et: Väga mürgine allaneelamisel, R28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä nieltynä, R28
fr: Très toxique en cas d'ingestion, R28
hu: Lenyelve nagyon mérgező (toxikus), R28
it: Molto tossico per ingestione, R28
lt: Labai toksiška prarijus, R28
lv: Ļoti toksisks norijot, R28
mt: Tossiku ħafna jekk jinbela', R28
nl: Zeer vergiftig bij opname door de mond, R28
no: Meget giftig ved svelging, R28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie po połknięciu, R28
pt: Muito tóxico por ingestão, R28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý po požití, R28
sl: Zelo strupeno pri zaužitju, R28
sv: Mycket giftigt vid förtäring, R28

de: Entwickelt bei Berührung mit Wasser giftige Gase, R29
en: Contact with water liberates toxic gas, R29
cs: Uvolňuje toxický plyn při styku s vodou, R29
dk: Udvikler giftig gas ved kontakt med vand, R29
el: Σε επαφή µε το νερό ελευθερώνονται τοξικά αέρια, R29
es: En contacto con agua libera gases tóxicos, R29
et: Kokkupuutel veega eraldub mürgine gaas, R29
fi: Kehittää myrkyllistä kaasua veden kanssa, R29
fr: Au contact de l'eau\, dégage des gaz toxiques, R29
hu: Vízzel érintkezve mérgező gázok képződnek, R29
it: A contatto con l'acqua libera gas tossici, R29
lt: Reaguodama su vandeniu\, išskiria toksiškas dujas, R29
lv: Saskaroties ar ūdeni\, izdala toksiskas gāzes, R29
mt: Jitfa' gass tossiku meta jmiss l-ilma, R29
nl: Vormt vergiftig gas in contact met water, R29
no: Ved kontakt med vann utvikles giftig gass, R29
pl: W kontakcie z wodą uwalnia toksyczne gazy, R29
pt: Em contacto com a água liberta gases tóxicos, R29
sk: Pri kontakte s vodou uvol’ňuje jedovatý plyn, R29
sl: V stiku z vodo se sprošča strupen plin, R29
sv: Utvecklar giftig gas vid kontakt med vatten, R29

de: Durch Schlag\, Reibung\, Feuer oder andere Zündquellen besonders explosionsgefährlich, R3
en: Extreme risk of explosion by shock\, friction\, fire or other sources of ignition, R3
cs: Velké nebezpečí výbuchu při úderu\, tření\, ohni nebo působením jiných zdrojů zapálení, R3
dk: Meget eksplosionsfarlig ved stød\, gnidning\, ild eller andre antændelseskilder, R3
el: Πολύ µεγάλος κίνδυνος εκρήξεως από κρούση\, τριβή\, φωτιά ή άλλες πηγές αναφλέξεως, R3
es: Alto riesgo de explosión por choque\, fricción\, fuego u otras fuentes de ignición, R3
et: Eriti plahvatusohtlik löögi\, hõõrdumise\, tule või muu süttimisallika toimel, R3
fi: Erittäin helposti räjähtävää iskun\, hankauksen\, avotulen tai muun sytytyslähteen vaikutuksesta, R3
fr: Grand risque d'explosion par le choc\, la friction\, le feu ou d'autres sources d'ignition, R3
hu: Ütés\, súrlódás\, tűz vagy egyéb gyújtóforrás rendkívüli mértékben növeli a robbanásveszélyt, R3
it: Elevato rischio di esplosione per urto\, sfregamento\, fuoco o altre sorgenti d'ignizione, R3
lt: Ypač didelė sprogimo rizika nuo smūgio\, trinties\, ugnies ar kitų uždegimo šaltinių, R3
lv: Augsts sprādziena risks trieciena\, berzes\, liesmas vai cita aizdedzināšanas avota iedarbībā, R3
mt: Riskju kbir ħafna ta' splużjoni minn xokk\, frizzjoni\, nar jew ghejun oħra ta' qbid, R3
nl: Ernstig ontploffingsgevaar door schok\, wrijving\, vuur of andere ontstekingsoorzaken, R3
no: Meget eksplosjonsfarlig ved støt\, gnidning\, ild eller andre antennelseskilder, R3
pl: Skrajne zagrożenie wybuchem wskutek uderzenia\, tarcia\, kontaktu z ogniem lub innymi źródłami zapłonu, R3
pt: Grande risco de explosão por choque\, fricção\, fogo ou outras fontes de ignição, R3
sk: Mimoriadne riziko výbuchu nárazom\, trením\, horením alebo inými zdrojmi zapálenia, R3
sl: Velika nevarnost eksplozije ob udarcu\, trenju\, požaru ali drugih virih vžiga, R3
sv: Mycket explosivt vid stöt\, friktion\, eld eller annan antändningsorsak, R3

de: Kann bei Gebrauch leicht entzündlich werden, R30
en: Can become highly flammable in use, R30
cs: Při používání se může stát vysoce hořlavým, R30
dk: Kan blive meget brandfarlig under brug, R30
el: Κατά τη χρήση γίνεται πολύ εύφλεκτο, R30
es: Puede inflamarse fácilmente al usarlo, R30
et: Kasutamisel võib muutuda väga tuleohtlikuks, R30
fi: Käytettäessä voi muuttua helposti syttyväksi, R30
fr: Peut devenir facilement inflammable pendant l'utilisation, R30
hu: A használat során tűzveszélyessé válik, R30
it: Può divenire facilmente infiammabile durante l'uso, R30
lt: Naudojama gali tapti labai degi, R30
lv: Var viegli uzliesmot lietošanas laikā, R30
mt: Jista' jaqbad malajr waqt li jintuża, R30
nl: Kan bij gebruik licht ontvlambaar worden, R30
no: Kan bli meget brannfarlig under bruk, R30
pl: Podczas stosowania może stać się wysoce łatwopalny, R30
pt: Pode tornar-se facilmente inflamável durante o uso, R30
sk: Pri použití sa môže stat’ vel’mi horl’avým, R30
sl: Med uporabo utegne postati „lahko vnetljivo“, R30
sv: Kan bli mycket brandfarlig vid användning, R30

de: Entwickelt bei Berührung mit Säure giftige Gase, R31
en: Contact with acids liberates toxic gas, R31
cs: Uvolňuje toxický plyn při styku s kyselinami, R31
dk: Udvikler giftig gas ved kontakt med syre, R31
el: Σε επαφή µε οξέα ελευθερώνονται τοξικά αέρια, R31
es: En contacto con ácidos libera gases tóxicos, R31
et: Kokkupuutel hapetega eraldub mürgine gaas, R31
fi: Kehittää myrkyllistä kaasua hapon kanssa, R31
fr: Au contact d'un acide\, dégage un gaz toxique, R31
hu: Savval érintkezve mérgező gázok képződnek, R31
it: A contatto con acidi libera gas tossico, R31
lt: Reaguodama su rūgštimis\, išskiria toksiškas dujas, R31
lv: Saskaroties ar skābēm\, izdala toksiskas gāzes, R31
mt: Jitfa' gass tossiku meta jmiss l-aċidi, R31
nl: Vormt vergiftige gassen in contact met zuren, R31
no: Ved kontakt med syre utvikles giftig gass, R31
pl: W kontakcie z kwasami uwalnia toksyczne gazy, R31
pt: Em contacto com ácidos liberta gases tóxicos, R31
sk: Pri kontakte s kyselinami uvol’ňuje jedovatý plyn, R31
sl: V stiku s kislinami se sprošča strupen plin, R31
sv: Utvecklar giftig gas vid kontakt med syra, R31

de: Entwickelt bei Berührung mit Säure sehr giftige Gase, R32
en: Contact with acids liberates very toxic gas, R32
cs: Uvolňuje vysoce toxický plyn při styku s kyselinami, R32
dk: Udvikler meget giftig gas ved kontakt med syre, R32
el: Σε επαφή µε οξέα ελευθερώνονται πολύ τοξικά αέρια, R32
es: En contacto con ácidos libera gases muy tóxicos, R32
et: Kokkupuutel hapetega eraldub väga mürgine gaas, R32
fi: Kehittää erittäin myrkyllistä kaasua hapon kanssa, R32
fr: Au contact d'un acide\, dégage un gaz très toxique, R32
hu: Savval érintkezve nagyon mérgező gázok képződnek, R32
it: A contatto con acidi libera gas molto tossico, R32
lt: Reaguodama su rūgštimis\, išskiria labai toksiškas dujas, R32
lv: Saskaroties ar skābēm\, izdala ļoti toksiskas gāzes, R32
mt: Jitfa' gass tossiku ħafna meta jmiss l-aċidi, R32
nl: Vormt zeer vergiftige gassen in contact met zuren, R32
no: Ved kontakt med syre utvikles meget giftig gass, R32
pl: W kontakcie z kwasami uwalnia bardzo toksyczne gazy, R32
pt: Em contacto com ácidos liberta gases muito tóxicos, R32
sk: Pri kontakte s kyselinami uvol’ňuje vel’mi jedovatý plyn, R32
sl: V stiku s kislinami se sprošča zelo strupen plin, R32
sv: Utvecklar mycket giftig gas vid kontakt med syra, R32

de: Gefahr kumulativer Wirkungen, R33
en: Danger of cumulative effects, R33
cs: Nebezpečí kumulativních účinků, R33
dk: Kan ophobes i kroppen efter gentagen brug, R33
el: Κίνδυνος αθροιστικών επιδράσεων, R33
es: Peligro de efectos acumulativos, R33
et: Kumulatiivse toime oht, R33
fi: Terveydellisten haittojen vaara pitkäaikaisessa altistuksessa, R33
fr: Danger d'effets cumulatifs, R33
hu: A halmozódó (kumulatív) hatások miatt veszélyes, R33
it: Pericolo di effetti cumulativi, R33
lt: Pavojinga – kaupiasi organizme, R33
lv: Kaitīgas kumulatīvas ietekmes draudi, R33
mt: Periklu ta' effetti kumulattivi, R33
nl: Gevaar voor cumulatieve effecten, R33
no: Kan lagres i kroppen ved gjentatt bruk, R33
pl: Niebezpieczeństwo kumulacji w organizmie, R33
pt: Perigo de efeitos cumulativos, R33
sk: Nebezpečenstvo kumulatívnych účinkov, R33
sl: Nevarnost za zdravje zaradi kopičenja v organizmu, R33
sv: Kan ansamlas i kroppen och ge skador, R33

de: Verursacht Verätzungen, R34
en: Causes burns, R34
cs: Způsobuje poleptání, R34
dk: Ætsningsfare, R34
el: Προκαλεί εγκαύµατα, R34
es: Provoca quemaduras, R34
et: Põhjustab söövitust, R34
fi: Syövyttävää, R34
fr: Provoque des brûlures, R34
hu: Égési sérülést okoz, R34
it: Provoca ustioni, R34
lt: Nudegina, R34
lv: Rada apdegumus, R34
mt: Jikkaġuna l-ħruq (fil-ġisem), R34
nl: Veroorzaakt brandwonden, R34
no: Etsende, R34
pl: Powoduje oparzenia, R34
pt: Provoca queimaduras, R34
sk: Spôsobuje popáleniny/poleptanie, R34
sl: Povzroča opekline, R34
sv: Frätande, R34

de: Verursacht schwere Verätzungen, R35
en: Causes severe burns, R35
cs: Způsobuje těžké poleptání, R35
dk: Alvorlig ætsningsfare, R35
el: Προκαλεί σοβαρά εγκαύµατα, R35
es: Provoca quemaduras graves, R35
et: Põhjustab tugevat söövitust, R35
fi: Voimakkaasti syövyttävää, R35
fr: Provoque de graves brûlures, R35
hu: Súlyos égési sérülést okoz, R35
it: Provoca gravi ustioni, R35
lt: Stipriai nudegina, R35
lv: Rada smagus apdegumus, R35
mt: Jikkaġuna ħruq serju (fil-ġisem), R35
nl: Veroorzaakt ernstige brandwonden, R35
no: Sterkt etsende, R35
pl: Powoduje poważne oparzenia, R35
pt: Provoca queimaduras graves, R35
sk: Spôsobuje silné popáleniny/poleptanie, R35
sl: Povzroča hude opekline, R35
sv: Starkt frätande, R35

en: Irritant
da: Lokalirriterende
de: Reizend
el: Ερεθιστικό
es: Irritante
fi: Ärsyttävä
fr: Irritant
it: Irritante
nl: Irriterend
pt: Irritante
sv: Irriterande

de: Reizt die Augen, R36
en: Irritating to eyes, R36
cs: Dráždí oči, R36
dk: Irriterer øjnene, R36
el: Ερεθίζει τα µάτια, R36
es: Irrita los ojos, R36
et: Ärritab silmi, R36
fi: Ärsyttää silmiä, R36
fr: Irritant pour les yeux, R36
hu: Szemizgató hatású, R36
it: Irritante per gli occhi, R36
lt: Dirgina akis, R36
lv: Kairina acis, R36
mt: Jirrita l-għajnejn, R36
nl: Irriterend voor de ogen, R36
no: Irriterer øynene, R36
pl: Działa drażniąco na oczy, R36
pt: Irritante para os olhos, R36
sk: Dráždi oči, R36
sl: Draži oči, R36
sv: Irriterar ögonen, R36

de: Reizt die Augen und die Atmungsorgane, R36/37
en: Irritating to eyes and respiratory system, R36/37
cs: Dráždí oči a dý chací orgány, R36/37
dk: Irriterer øjnene og åndedrætsorganerne, R36/37
el: Ερεθίζει τα µάτια και το αναπνευστικό σύστηµα, R36/37
es: Irrita los ojos y las vías respiratorias, R36/37
et: Ärritab silmi ja hingamiselundeid, R36/37
fi: Ärsyttää silmiä ja hengityselimiä, R36/37
fr: Irritant pour les yeux et les voies respiratoires, R36/37
hu: Szemizgató hatású\, izgatja a légutakat, R36/37
it: Irritante per gli occhi e le vie respiratorie, R36/37
lt: Dirgina akis ir kvėpavimo takus, R36/37
lv: Kairina acis un elpošanas sistēmu, R36/37
mt: Jirrita l-għajnejn u s-sistema respiratorja, R36/37
nl: Irriterend voor de ogen en de ademhalingswegen, R36/37
no: Irriterer øynene og luftveiene, R36/37
pl: Działa drażniąco na oczy i drogi oddechowe, R36/37
pt: Irritante para os olhos e vias respiratórias, R36/37
sk: Dráždi oči a dýchacie cesty, R36/37
sl: Draži oči in dihala, R36/37
sv: Irriterar ögonen och andningsorganen, R36/37

de: Reizt die Augen\, die Atmungsorgane und die Haut, R36/37/38
en: Irritating to eyes\, respiratory system and skin, R36/37/38
cs: Dráždí oči\, dý chací orgány a kůži, R36/37/38
dk: Irriterer øjnene\, åndedrætsorganerne og huden, R36/37/38
el: Ερεθίζει τα µάτια\, το αναπνευστικό σύστηµα και το δέρµα, R36/37/38
es: Irrita los ojos\, la piel y las vías respiratorias, R36/37/38
et: Ärritab silmi\, hingamiselundeid ja nahka, R36/37/38
fi: Ärsyttää silmiä\, hengityselimiä ja ihoa, R36/37/38
fr: Irritant pour les yeux\, les voies respiratoires et la peau, R36/37/38
hu: Szem- és bőrizgató hatású\, izgatja a légutakat, R36/37/38
it: Irritante per gli occhi\, le vie respiratorie e la pelle, R36/37/38
lt: Dirgina akis\, kvėpavimo takus ir odą, R36/37/38
lv: Kairina acis\, ādu un elpošanas sistēmu, R36/37/38
mt: Jirrita l-għajnejn\, is-sistema respiratorja u l-ġilda, R36/37/38
nl: Irriterend voor de ogen\, de ademhalingswegen en de huid, R36/37/38
no: Irriterer øynene\, luftveiene og huden, R36/37/38
pl: Działa drażniąco na oczy\, drogi oddechowe i skórę, R36/37/38
pt: Irritante para os olhos\, vias respiratórias e pele, R36/37/38
sk: Dráždi oči\, dýchacie cesty a pokožku, R36/37/38
sl: Draži oči\, dihala in kožo, R36/37/38
sv: Irriterar ögonen\, andningsorganen och huden, R36/37/38